Idaho, session 2026, S1325.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-402. ANNUAL REGISTRATION. (1) The annual fee for operating each
pickup truck, each neighborhood electric vehicle and each other motor ve-
hicle having a maximum gross weight not in excess of eight thousand (8,000)
pounds and that complies with the federal motor vehicle safety standards as
defined in section 49-107, Idaho Code, shall be:
Vehicles one (1) and two (2) years old .........................$69.00
Vehicles three (3) and four (4) years old ......................$57.00
Vehicles five (5) and six (6) years old ........................$57.00
Vehicles seven (7) and eight (8) years old .....................$45.00
Vehicles over eight (8) years old .............................$45.00
There shall be twelve (12) registration periods, starting in January
for holders of validation registration stickers numbered 1, and proceed-
ing consecutively through December for holders of validation registration
stickers numbered 12, each of which shall start on the first day of a calen-
dar month and end on the last day of the twelfth month from the first day of
the beginning month. Registration periods shall expire at midnight on the
last day of the registration period in the year designated by the validation
registration sticker. The numeral digit on the validation registration
stickers shall, as does the registration card, fix the registration period
under the staggered registration system for the purpose of reregistration
and notice of expiration.
A vehicle that has once been registered for any of the above-designated
periods shall, upon reregistration, be registered for the period bearing the
same number, and the registration card shall show and be the exclusive proof
of the expiration date of registration and licensing. Vehicles may be ini-
tially registered for less than a twelve (12) month period, or for more than a
twelve (12) month period, and the fee prorated on a monthly basis if the frac-
tional registration tends to fulfill the purpose of the monthly series reg-
istration system.
(2) For all school buses operated either by a nonprofit, nonpublic
school or operated pursuant to a service contract with a school district for
transporting children to or from school or in connection with school-ap-
proved activities, the annual fee shall be twenty-four dollars ($24.00) and


shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration
and notice of expiration.
(3) For all motorcycles and motor-driven cycles that comply with the
federal motor vehicle safety standards, operated on the public highways, the
annual fee shall be nineteen dollars ($19.00) and shall be subject to stag-
gered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expira-
tion.
(4) For operation of an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle or
motorbike, excluding a motorbike with an engine displacement of fifty (50)
cubic centimeters or less, on city, county or highway district roads or
highways open to such use, a restricted vehicle license plate fee pursuant
to section 49-450, Idaho Code, shall be paid. In addition, the certifi-
cate of number fee specified in section 67-7122, Idaho Code, shall be paid
as provided in section 67-7122, Idaho Code. The certificate of number and
restricted vehicle license plate exemption provided in section 49-426(2),
Idaho Code, applies to all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, motor-
bikes and motorcycles used for the purposes described in section 49-426(2),
Idaho Code. Nonresidents shall be allowed to purchase a restricted vehicle
license plate and validation sticker pursuant to section 67-7124, Idaho
Code, for an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, or motorbike.
(5) For all motor homes, the fee shall be as specified in subsection (1)
of this section and shall be in addition to the fees provided for in section
49-445, Idaho Code.
(6) Registration fees shall not be subject to refund.
(7) A financial institution or repossession service contracted to
a financial institution repossessing vehicles under the terms of a secu-
rity agreement shall move the vehicle from the place of repossession to the
financial institution's place of business on a repossession plate. The
repossession plate shall also be used for demonstrating the vehicle to a
prospective purchaser for a period not to exceed ninety-six (96) hours. The
registration fees for repossession plates shall be as required in subsection
(1) of this section for a vehicle one (1) and two (2) years old. All other
fees required under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be in addition to
the registration fee. The repossession plate shall be subject to staggered
registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.
(8) A wrecker or towing business engaged in the process of towing motor-
ized vehicles that have been wrecked, abandoned, salvaged or may be disabled
may apply for a wrecker plate to be displayed on those vehicles being towed,
provided the power unit is properly registered under this chapter. The reg-
istration fees for wrecker plates shall be as required in subsection (1) of
this section for a vehicle one (1) and two (2) years old. All other fees re-
quired under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be in addition to the reg-
istration fee and shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose
of reregistration and notice of expiration.
(9) In addition to the annual registration fee in this section, there
shall be an initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and an annual
program fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for all special license plate pro-
grams for those license plates issued pursuant to sections 49-404A, 49-407,
49-408, 49-409, 49-414, 49-416, 49-418 and 49-418D, Idaho Code. For special
plates issued pursuant to sections 49-417E, and 49-417G, Idaho Code, there


shall be an initial program fee of seventy dollars ($70.00) and an annual
program fee of fifty dollars ($50.00). For special plates issued pursuant to
sections 49-406 and 49-406A, Idaho Code, there shall be an initial program
fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) but there shall be no annual renewal fee.
For special plates issued pursuant to sections 49-415D, 49-417, 49-417A,
49-417B, 49-417C, 49-417D, 49-418A, 49-418B, 49-418C, 49-419, 49-419A,
49-419C, 49-419E, 49-420, 49-420A, 49-420B, 49-420C, 49-420D, 49-420E,
49-420J, 49-420K, 49-420L, 49-420M, 49-420N, 49-420O, 49-420P, 49-420Q,
49-420R, 49-420S, and 49-420T, and 49-420T 49-420U, Idaho Code, and unless
otherwise expressly provided for in this chapter, any new special plate
program effective on and after January 1, 2013, pursuant to section 49-402D,
Idaho Code, there shall be an initial program fee of thirty-five dollars
($35.00) and an annual program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The fees
contained in this subsection shall be applicable to all new special plate
programs and shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of
reregistration and notice of expiration. The initial program fee and the
annual program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall
be used to fund the cost of administration of special license plate programs,
unless otherwise specified by law.
(10) Any vehicle that does not meet federal motor vehicle safety stan-
dards shall not be registered and shall not be permitted to operate on public
highways of the state, as defined in section 40-117, Idaho Code, unless oth-
erwise specifically authorized.
(11) In addition to annual registration fees as provided in this sec-
tion, registrants may pay a fee to purchase an Idaho state parks passport
authorizing resident motor vehicle entry into all Idaho state parks. Reg-
istrants may pay the fee for a one (1) year or two (2) year period of time.
The fee shall be ten dollars ($10.00) for one (1) year and twenty dollars
($20.00) for two (2) years. All fees collected pursuant to this subsection
shall be deposited into the park and recreation fund and shall be subject to
appropriation. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall not be con-
sidered a motor vehicle registration fee as provided in section 17, article
VII of the constitution of the state of Idaho.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 4, Title 49, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 49-417G, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
49-417G. WHITE AND BLACK LICENSE PLATES. (1) On and after July 1, 2026,
any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of
section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for
which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon de-
partment approval, receive special white and black license plates in lieu of
regular license plates.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with
a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds.
Availability of the white and black license plates for other vehicles shall
be subject to the rules, policies, and procedures of the department.
(3) In addition to the regular registration fee required pursuant
to this chapter, the applicant shall be charged a fee of seventy dollars
($70.00) for the initial issuance of plates and fifty dollars ($50.00) for


each succeeding annual registration. Five dollars ($5.00) of the initial
fee and five dollars ($5.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the
state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration
of this special license plate program. Sixty-five dollars ($65.00) of each
initial fee and forty-five dollars ($45.00) of each renewal fee shall be
transferred by the state treasurer to the Idaho law enforcement fund created
pursuant to section 67-2914, Idaho Code, and shall be used exclusively for
the purposes described in section 49-454(3), Idaho Code.
(4) Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the pro-
visions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer
the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer
fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt
of the new registration from the department.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code, the
white and black license plate shall have a white background and black charac-
ters. The design shall be approved by the department, utilizing a numbering
system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program,
including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho law enforcement
fund.
(6) The white and black license plate established in this section shall
be exempt from the requirements of section 49-402D, Idaho Code.
(7) Sample white and black license plates may be purchased for a fee of
thirty dollars ($30.00), five dollars ($5.00) of which shall be deposited in
the state highway account and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of which shall be
transferred to the Idaho law enforcement fund and shall be used exclusively
for the purposes described in section 49-454(3), Idaho Code. No additional
fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.